California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 ($400,000’ for ‘$1,000,000 ($500,000’ in clause (ii) thereof)” for the phrase “(within the meaning of section 163(h)(3)(B), applied by substituting ‘$2,000,000 ($1,000,000’ for ‘$1,000,000 ($500,000’ in clause (ii) thereof)” contained therein.

(c) This section shall apply to discharges of indebtedness occurring on or after January 1, 2007, and, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no penalties or interest shall be due with respect to the discharge of qualified principal residence
 indebtedness during the 2007 or 2009 taxable year regardless of whether or not the taxpayer reports the discharge on their return for the 2007 or 2009 taxable year.

(d) The amendments made by Section 202 of the American Taxpayer Relief Act of 2012 (Public Law 112-240) to Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply.

(e) The changes made to this section by Section 1 of Chapter 152 of the Statutes of 2014 shall apply to discharges of indebtedness that occur on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2014, and, notwithstanding any other law, no penalties or interest shall be due with respect to the discharge of qualified principal residence indebtedness during the 2013 taxable year, regardless of whether the taxpayer reports the discharge on their income
 tax return for the 2013 taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 21.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17144.8.

(a) Section 108(f)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to discharges on account of death or disability, as added by Section 11031(a) of the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97), shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 108(f)(5)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 11031(a) of the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97), is modified by substituting the phrase “after December 31, 2018,” in lieu of the phrase “after December 31, 2017, and before January 1, 2026.”

(c) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January
 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 9675(a) of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) to Section 108(f)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the special rule for discharges in 2021 through 2025, shall apply.

(2) (A) For purposes of complying with Section 41, as it pertains to this subdivision, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(i) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the exclusion is to provide financial relief to taxpayers with discharges of student loan debt.

(ii) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the exclusion has achieved this goal shall be the number of taxpayers excluding discharge of indebtedness income based
 on this subdivision, and the total dollar value of income so excluded.

(B) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall, no later than October 1, 2026, submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that estimates the number of taxpayers with discharged student loan debt excluded from income, and estimates the total dollar value of the debt discharged, to the extent data is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 120.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17145.

(a) A regulated investment company, as defined in Section 851 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to definition of regulated investment company, or series thereof, is qualified to pay exempt-interest dividends to its shareholders if, at the close of each quarter of its taxable year, at least 50 percent of the value of its total assets consists of obligations which, when held by an individual, the
 interest therefrom is exempt from taxation by this state.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Aggregate reported amount” means the aggregate amount of dividends reported by the company under paragraph (4) as exempt-interest dividends for the taxable year (including exempt-interest dividends paid after the close of the taxable year described in Section 855 of the Internal Revenue Code).

(2) “Excess reported amount” means the excess of the aggregate reported amount over the exempt interest of the company for the taxable year.

(3) “Exempt interest” means, with respect to any regulated investment company, the excess of the amount of interest received by it during its taxable year on obligations, interest on which, if held by an individual, is exempt from
 taxation by this state, over the amounts that, if it were treated as an individual, would be disallowed as deductions under Section 17280 of this part or Section 171(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), “exempt-interest dividend” means any dividend or part thereof (other than a capital gain dividend) paid by a regulated investment company or series thereof and reported by the company as an exempt-interest dividend in written statements furnished to its shareholders.

(B) If the aggregate reported amount with respect to the company for any taxable year exceeds the exempt interest of the company for such taxable year, an exempt-interest dividend is the excess of the reported exempt-interest dividend amount over the excess reported amount which is allocable to such reported exempt-interest dividend amount.

(C) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the excess reported amount (if any) which is allocable to the reported exempt-interest dividend amount is that portion of the excess reported amount which bears the same ratio to the excess reported amount as the reported exempt-interest dividend amount bears to the aggregate reported amount.

(ii) In the case of a taxable year which does not begin and end in the same calendar year, if the post-December reported amount equals or exceeds the excess reported amount for such taxable year, clause (i) shall be applied by substituting “post-December reported amount” for “aggregate reported amount” and no excess reported amount shall be allocated to any dividend paid on or before December 31 of such taxable year.

(5) “Post-December reported amount” means the
 aggregate reported amount determined by taking into account only dividends paid after December 31 of the taxable year.

(6) “Reported exempt-interest dividend amount” means the amount reported to its shareholders under paragraph (4) as an exempt-interest dividend.

(7) “Series” means a segregated portfolio of assets, the beneficial interest in which is owned by the holders of a class or series of stock of the regulated investment company that is preferred over all other classes or series with respect to that portfolio of assets.

(8) “Value” means, with respect to securities (other than those of majority-owned subsidiaries) for which market quotations are readily available, the market value of those securities; and with respect to other securities and assets, fair market value as determined in good faith by the board of
 directors or trustees, except that in the case of securities of majority-owned subsidiaries that are investment companies, as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, that fair value shall not exceed market value or asset value, whichever is higher.

(c) An exempt-interest dividend shall be treated by recipients thereof as an item of interest excludable from income.

(d) In the case of a qualified fund of funds, as defined in Section 852(g)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to fund of funds, that fund shall be qualified to pay tax-exempt dividends to its shareholders without regard to whether that fund satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a).

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after December 23,
 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 490, Sec. 2.   (AB 1423)   Effective October 6, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17146.

The compensation of employees of a foreign country shall be determined in accordance with Section 893 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 26.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17147.7.

(a) Gross income does not include any income which is received as a reward from a crime hotline that is authorized by any governmental entity.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “crime hotline” means any method of direct communication established by a government agency or a private, nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section 23701d for the purpose of permitting individuals to report criminal activity to that agency or organization, or any other designated
 government agency.

(c) This section shall not apply to an employee of an agency or organization establishing or operating a crime hotline or to an employee of an organization that has contributed to the reward described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17149.

(a) Gross income does not include compensation or the fair market value of any other benefit, except salary or wages, received by an employee from an employer for participation in any ridesharing arrangement in California, including those specified in subdivision (b).

(b) For purposes of this section, compensation or the fair market value of any other benefit received for participation in a ridesharing arrangement in California includes compensation or other benefit
 received for:

(1) Commuting in a vanpool.

(2) Commuting in a private commuter bus or buspool.

(3) A transit pass for use by the employee or his or her dependents, other than transit passes for use by elementary and secondary school students who are dependents of the employee.

(4) Commuting in a subscription taxipool.

(5) Commuting in a carpool.

(6) Free or subsidized parking.

(7) An employee’s bicycling to or from his or her place of employment.

(8) Commuting by ferry.

(9) The use of an alternative transportation method, other than a method otherwise specified in this subdivision, that reduces the use of a motor vehicle by a single occupant to travel to or from that individual’s place of employment.

(10) Travel to or from a telecommuting facility.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Vanpool” means seven or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry 7 to 15 adults, including the driver, that is used to transport those persons who commute to and from work on a regular basis.

(2) “Transit pass” means any purchase of transit rides that entitles the holder to any number of
 transit rides to and from the workplace, whether at a discount rate or the base fare rate.

(3) “Transit” means transportation service for use by the general public that utilizes buses, railcars, or ferries with a seating capacity of 16 or more persons.

(4) “Subscription taxipool” means a type of service in which employers or groups of employees contract with a public or private taxi operator to provide daily commuter service for a group of preassembled subscribers on a prepaid or daily fare basis following a relatively fixed route and schedule tailored to meet the needs of the subscribers.

(5) “Ridesharing arrangement” means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where that transportation is incidental to another purpose of the driver. The term includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools,
 and buspools.

(6) “Carpool” means two or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry less than seven adults, including the driver.

(7) “Buspool” means 16 or more persons commuting on a daily basis to and from work by means of a vehicle with a seating arrangement designed to carry more than 15 adult passengers.

(8) “Private commuter bus” means a highway vehicle which meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Has a seating capacity of at least seven adults, including the driver.

(B) At least 50 percent of the mileage of which can be reasonably expected to be used for the purpose of transporting employees to and
 from work.

(C) Is acquired by the taxpayer on or after the date of enactment of this section.

(D) With respect to which the taxpayer makes an election under this paragraph on his or her return for the taxable year in which the vehicle is placed in service.

(9) “Free or subsidized parking” means the benefit received from an employer for parking while participating in a ridesharing arrangement within California.

(10) “Alternative commute program” means any alternative transportation method or program the purpose of which is to reduce the use of a motor vehicle by a single occupant to travel to and from that individual’s place of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17149.1.

Section 132(f)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to suspension of qualified bicycle commuting reimbursement exclusion, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 22.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17149.2.

Section 132(g)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified moving expense reimbursement suspension for taxable years 2018 to 2025, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 23.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17151.

(a) Gross income of an employee does not include any amounts, not exceeding an aggregate amount of five thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($5,250) per calendar year, that is paid or incurred by the employer for educational assistance to the employee pursuant to an educational assistance program.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Educational assistance” means the
 payment by an employer of expenses incurred by or on behalf of an employee for the employee’s education, and includes, but is not limited to, payments for books, supplies, equipment, tuition, and fees, and similar payments. “Educational assistance” includes the provision by an employer of courses of instruction for an employee, including the provision of books, supplies, and equipment. “Educational assistance” does not include any payment for, or the provision of, any of the following:

(A) Any tools or supplies that may be retained by the employee after completion of a course of instruction.

(B) Any meals, lodging, or transportation.

(C) Any course or education involving sports, games, or hobbies.

(D) Any course or education taken at the graduate level
 of a kind normally taken by an individual pursuing a program leading to a law, business, medical, or other advanced academic or professional degree. This subparagraph applies only to any course or education taken at the graduate level beginning after June 30, 1996, and before January 1, 2000.

(2) “Educational assistance program” means a separate written plan of an employer for the exclusive benefit of his or her employees to provide those employees with educational assistance. The program shall meet the following requirements:

(A) The program benefits employees who qualify under a classification established by the employer and found by the Franchise Tax Board not to be discriminatory in favor of employees who are highly compensated employees (within the meaning of Section 414(q) of the Internal Revenue Code) or their dependents. For purposes of this subparagraph, there shall be
 excluded from consideration employees who are not included in the program and who are included in a unit of employees covered by an agreement that the Franchise Tax Board finds to be a collective bargaining agreement between employee representatives and one or more employers, if there is evidence that educational assistance benefits were the subject of good faith bargaining between the employee representatives and the employer or employers.

(B) Not more than 5 percent of the amounts paid or incurred by the employer for educational assistance during the year may be provided for the class of individuals who are owners (or their spouses or dependents), each of whom, on any day of the year, owns more than 5 percent of the capital or profits interest in the employer.

(C) The program does not provide eligible employees with a choice between educational assistance and other remuneration
 includable in gross income. For purposes of this section, the business practices of the employer, as well as the written program, shall be taken into account.

(D) The program need not be funded.

(E) Reasonable notification of the availability and terms of the program is provided to eligible employees.

(3) “Employee” includes self-employed individuals within the meaning of Section 401(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) Any individual who owns the entire interest in an unincorporated trade or business shall be treated as his or her own employee.

(2) A partnership shall be treated as the
 employer of each partner who is an employee within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(3) (A) An educational assistance program shall not be considered to fail to meet any of the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) on the sole basis of either of the following:

(i) Different utilization rates for the different types of educational assistance made available under the program.

(ii) Successful completion or attainment of a particular course grade is required for or considered in determining reimbursement under the program.

(B) This section shall not be construed to affect the deduction or inclusion in income of amounts that are paid or incurred or received as reimbursement for educational expenses under
 Section 117, 162, or 212 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) No deduction or credit shall be allowed to the employee with respect to any amount that the employee excludes from income pursuant to this section.

(e) Section 127 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(f) This section shall apply with respect to expenses relating to courses beginning after June 30, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 107, Sec. 6.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17151.1.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, Section 128 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to employer contributions to 530A accounts, added by Section 70204(b)(1) of Public Law 119-21, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 4.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17151.2.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, Section 139J of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain contributions to 530A accounts, added by Section 70204(c)(1) of Public Law 119-21, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 5.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17152.

Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exclusion of gain from sale of principal residence, is modified as follows:

(a) The two-year period in Section 121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be reduced by the period of the taxpayer’s service, not to exceed 18 months, in the Peace Corps during the five-year period ending on the date of the sale
 or exchange.

(b) If the taxpayer is prohibited from filing a joint return pursuant to Section 18521, Section 121(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall nevertheless be treated as being satisfied if the taxpayer files a joint return for federal income tax purposes for the same taxable year. However, in no instance shall the total amount excludable from gross income under Section 121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code with respect to any sale or exchange exceed the maximum amount allowed by Section 121(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 121(f) of the Internal Revenue Code not to have Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a sale or exchange, Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that sale or exchange for state purposes, a separate
 election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part, and that election shall be treated as an election to include in gross income for purposes of this part all the gain from the sale or exchange of that property, including that amount which, but for that election, would have been excluded from income under Section 121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make an election for federal purposes under Section 121(f) of the Internal Revenue Code to not have Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a sale or exchange, no election under Section 121(f) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be allowed for state purposes, Section 121 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that sale or exchange for state purposes, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(d) (1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 312(d)(2) of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), relating to sales before date of enactment, or Section 312(d)(4) of that act, relating to binding contracts, to not have the amendments made by Section 312 of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34) apply to a sale or exchange, the amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply to that sale or exchange, Sections 1, 4, and 6 of Chapter 610 of the Statutes of 1997 shall not apply to that sale or exchange, a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make
 an election for federal purposes under Section 312(d)(2) of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), relating to sales before date of enactment, or Section 312(d)(4) of that act, relating to binding contracts, to not have the amendments made by Section 312 of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34) apply to a sale or exchange, an election under Section 312(d)(2) of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), relating to sales before date of enactment, or Section 312(d)(4) of that act, relating to binding contracts, shall not be allowed for state purposes, the amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to that sale or exchange, Sections 1, 4, and 6 of Chapter 610 of the Statutes of 1997 shall apply to that sale or exchange, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(e) (1) If a taxpayer has,
 at any time, made or revoked an election for federal purposes under Section 121(d)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code to suspend the running of the five-year period described in Sections 121(a), 121(c)(1)(B), and 121(d)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, that election or revocation of election to suspend the five-year period under Section 121(d)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable for state purposes, a separate election or revocation of election for purposes of Section 121(d)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code may not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, and the federal election or revocation of election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make an election for federal purposes under Section 121(d)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code to suspend the running of the five-year period described in Sections 121(a), 121(c)(1)(B), and 121(d)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, that
 five-year period may not be suspended under Section 121(d)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code for state purposes, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(f) Section 121(d)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to property acquired from a decedent, shall not apply.

(g) The amendments made by Section 417 of the Tax Relief and Health Care Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-432) to Section 121(d)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to uniformed services, foreign service, and intelligence community, shall apply to sales or exchanges that occur on or after January 1, 2010.

(h) The amendments made by subdivision (a) of Section 7 of the Mortgage Forgiveness Debt Relief Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-142) to Section 121 of the Internal Revenue
 Code, relating to exclusion of gain from sale of principal residence, shall apply to sales or exchanges that occur on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 15.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17153.5.

Gross income does not include any amount received for empty beverage containers by a consumer from a recycling center or recycling location as the recycling value, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14502) of Division 12.1 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

17154.

Section 132(j)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application of section to otherwise taxable educational or training benefits, is modified by substituting “which are not excludable under Section 17151” in lieu of “which are not excludable under Section 127”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 20.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17155.

Gross income shall not include either of the following:

(a) (1) Any amount, including any interest or property, that is received as compensation in any taxable year by a taxpayer pursuant to the German Act Regulating Unresolved Property Claims, as amended (Gesetz zur Regelung offener Vermogensfragen).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the basis of any property received pursuant to the German Act Regulating
 Unresolved Property Claims shall be the fair market value of the property at the time of receipt by the taxpayer.

(b) (1) Any amount received by a taxpayer who is a Holocaust victim or the heir or beneficiary of a Holocaust victim as a result of a settlement of claims against any entity or individual for any recovered asset.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Holocaust victim” means a person who was persecuted by Nazi Germany or any Axis regime during any period from 1933 to 1945, inclusive.

(B) “Recovered asset” means any asset of any type, including any bank deposits, insurance proceeds, or artwork owned by a Holocaust victim during any period from 1920 to 1945, inclusive, withheld from that Holocaust victim or his or her
 heirs or beneficiaries from and after 1945, and not recovered, returned, or otherwise compensated to a Holocaust victim or his or her heirs or beneficiaries until 1995, or thereafter. “Recovered asset” shall also include any interest earned on any of these assets.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 29) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 962, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17155.5.

Gross income does not include any amount received as reparation payments paid by the German Foundation known as Remembrance, Responsibility, and the Future, or any other source of humanitarian reparations made for purposes of redressing the injustice done to persons who were required to perform slave or forced labor during World War II.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17156.

(a) Gross income shall not include any amount received as compensation in any taxable year by a taxpayer pursuant to Assembly Bill 110 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session.

(b) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 619, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Note: The Assembly Bill 110 referred to in the text became Ch. 619.)
-------------------------------------------

17156.1.

Section 139F of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain amounts received by wrongfully incarcerated individuals, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 8.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17156.2.

(a) Section 139C of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain disability-related first responder retirement payments, shall apply. 

(b) This section shall apply to amounts received with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 24.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17156.5.

Gross income does not include any amount received as reparation payments paid by the Canadian government for the purpose of redressing the injustice done to persons of Japanese ancestry who were interned in Canada during World War II.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 471, Sec. 2.   Effective September 23, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17157.

Gross income shall not include any amount received in any taxable year by a claimant pursuant to Section 4904 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 630, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17157.5.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2029, gross income does not include any Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount received by a taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event” means the elevated temperature landfill event, beginning on May 1, 2022, that occurred beneath the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles, California.

(2) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment” means any amount received by a taxpayer on or after March 1, 2024, as compensation
 for loss, damages, expenses, relocation, suffering, loss in real property value, closing costs with respect to real property, including realtor commissions, or inconvenience, including access to real property, resulting from the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event, if the amount was provided by either of the following:

(A) A federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(B) Waste Connections, Inc., any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of Waste Connections, Inc., or any person related to Waste Connections, Inc.

(c) The payor shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) This
 section shall remain operative only until December 1, 2029, and is repealed as of that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 15.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.

(a) Gross income does not include any of the following grant allocations:

(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the COVID-19 Relief Grant that is administered by the Office of Small Business Advocate, is funded by Executive Order No. E 20/21-182, and is described in a letter from the Department of Finance to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, dated December 17, 2020, entitled, “Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account Request—Increased Funding for the California Rebuilding Fund and Funding to Support a New COVID-19 Relief Grant for Small Businesses.”

(2) For taxable years beginning on
 or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Small Business COVID-19 Relief Grant Program established by Section 12100.83 of the Government Code.

(3) For taxable years beginning on or after September 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Venues Grant Program established by Section 12100.83.5 of the Government Code.

(4) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2030, grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Small Business and Nonprofit COVID-19 Supplemental Paid Sick Leave Relief Grant Program established by Section 12100.975 of the Government Code.

(b) Section 41 shall not apply to the exclusion allowed by this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Franchise Tax Board may include in audits the grants referenced in this section.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary and appropriate to implement this section.

(e) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until
 December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 736, Sec. 4.   (AB 152)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.1.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2025, gross income does not include grant allocations received by a taxpayer pursuant to the California Microbusiness COVID-19 Relief Program that is administered by the Office of Small Business Advocate pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 12100.90) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Section 41 shall not apply to the exclusion allowed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 22.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.2.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, gross income does not include any amount awarded as a restaurant revitalization grant pursuant to Section 9009c of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, paragraph (2) of Section 9673 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Paragraph (2) of Section 9673 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) is modified by substituting the phrase “provided by paragraph (1)” with “provided by this section.”

(c) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, guideline, or any other guidance established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 11.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.3.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, gross income does not include any amount awarded as a shuttered venue operator grant pursuant to Section 9009a of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17280, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019, subsection (d) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall apply, except as provided.

(2) Subsection (d) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) is modified by substituting the phrase “For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” with “For
 purposes of this part”.

(3) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (d) of Section 278 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) shall not apply to an ineligible entity.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ineligible entity” means a taxpayer that either:

(A) Is a publicly-traded company.

(B) Does not meet the reduction from the gross receipts requirements of Section 636(a)(37)(A)(iv)(bb) of Title 15 of the United States Code, as added by Section 311 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(2) “Publicly-traded company” means a publicly-traded entity
 as described in Section 342 of Division N of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260).

(d) This section shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 12.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.4.

Section 343 of the Protecting Americans from Tax Hikes Act of 2015 (Public Law 114-113), relating to exclusion from gross income of certain coal power grants to non-corporate taxpayers, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 25.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17158.5.

Section 3 of the Federal Disaster Tax Relief Act of 2023 (Public Law 118-148), relating to exclusion from gross income for compensation for losses or damages resulting from certain wildfires, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 26.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Deductions [17201. - 17299.9.]

17201.

(a) Part VI of Subchapter B of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to itemized deductions for individuals and corporations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Part VII of Subchapter B of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to additional itemized deductions for individuals, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(c) Part IX of Subchapter B of
 Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to items not deductible, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 12.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.1.

(a) Section 174 of the Internal Revenue Code as it read on January 1, 2015, relating to amortization of research and experimental expenditures, shall apply. 

(b) Section 217(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the suspension of the moving expense deduction for taxable years 2018 to 2025, shall not apply. 

(c) The amendments made by Section 13304 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 274 of the
 Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on deduction by employers of expenses for fringe benefits, shall not apply.

(d) The amendments made by Section 13202(a) of the Tax Cuts